Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
Number of Reviews
24

Author
Max Scheinin
What with the special edition out on video ( I snapped up my copy as
quickly as anyone ) I thought I'd make some comments on these films.
Why is Star Wars as charming and graceful as it is? 
Why has it endured as well as it has?
With the exceptions of James Earl Jones and Alec Guiness, the acting is
pretty mediocre. Let's just call it corny. ( Why, oh why, couldn't Lucas
use computers to substitute better performers in the lead roles? ) We never
really feel close to the characters. Why is it my candidate for the finest
pure entertainment ever commited to the screen? ( It's demeaning to Raiders
Of The Lost Ark, Jaws and The Empire Strikes Back to call them pure
entertainments. ) It's not a perfect film, but it's a heck of a good one.
Many of my friends have a respect bordering on a religious obsession with
it. ( My friend Adam - who thinks that ROTJ is the best of the trilogy and
TESB is the worst - owns paperback continuations of the movies and
soundtracks meant to be played along as you read. ) The film certainly has
a place in my heart although I'm not sure I love it as much as they.
Watching it today I feel manipulated. It hold up over numerous viewings and
yet...something is missing. To many remaking Star Wars is what remaking
Casablanca ( they're doing it! ) and The Godfather is to me: sad and
pointless. It would ruin the legend of the movie. Yet...I'll say it against
my better judgment ( and it will anger many people. ) If it's done do it
with a new script. Have Steven Spielberg
direct. Use new music. Set it in the future. Get rid of the first line (
along time ago in a galaxy far far away... ). Cast Jack Nicholson as Darth
Vader and get rid of the clunky outfit. Wait till I get to Hollywood!
Bwa,ha,ha,ha,ha,ha! 
Star Wars is still terrific fun and wonderfully entertaining. It's a really
good movie with a great one inside, struggling to break free.
How good is the second installment, TESB? In a word: magnificent. It's a
glorious film from start to finish. In the first shot it tells you what
it's going to do and then it does it.  A stirring comic book mix of great
acting, wonderful music, mature special effects, and dark thoughts, as
directed by Irvin Kershner - with ravishing gusto - the psychological
tension is so clear. And did I mention great fun? It'll sweep you off your
feet. So many moments, so many sights. A betrayal, a friendship, a great
movie...so good that I think I might call it one of the greatest ever
made.The special edition is truly special.  I could see  it once a week
without growing tired of it.
Sadly this cannot be said of ROTJ, the mediocre conclusion to the trilogy.
It's not bad, but it takes a suprising ( and disarming ) turn towards
mediocre filmmaking. I've always felt that it goes down TOO easily, when
you should hesitate before accepting the conclusion and outcome. Not that
it's bad; it's just not very meaningful. Fans of the film will argue with
me: "It's not even MEANT to be meaningful, you take yourself way to
seriously, blah blah blah, yada yada yada etc. etc.". Hmm...I'm not
entirely sure I agree. The entire Star Wars trilogy revolves around
religion ( the force ), and what can be seen as serious issues (  the
battle between good and evil. ) This is a fun movie but it doesn't quite
capture the sense of awe and excitement the first two do. It's meant to be
seen on a big screen. ( Much like Gone With The Wind, an entertaining but
wildy over-rated and equally mediocre film. ) Both films are esentially
entertainments that could have been alot better then they are.
As seen on a big screen ROTJ is great fun. ( If I had reviewed it after
seeing it on the big screen I would have gave it ***1/2 and B+. ) But I'm
talking little screen here - the video experience. And that ain't all that
great. I still like the film - but I don't love it.
I'm starting to worry that Mr. Lucas will not live up to our expectations
when he releases his new films. Perhaps there is no way he can. ( Of course
such a rule can be defied. I've never like Jurassic Park but I thought the
sequel was well crafted and a heck of alot of fun. ) But whether or  not he
does TESB is a movie to treasure and the other two aren't all that bad
either. 

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
STAR WARS did for the movies what Elvis Presley did for popular music:
broadened its scope, intensified its appeal, caused a shattering impact on
public consciousness. For every American under thirty and a good many over
thirty, STAR WARS stood as *the* cultural landmark (aside from maybe "Star
Trek" and Madonna) in its time.
What is most astonishing, twenty years later, is that STAR WARS has not
aged one bit. It has the same romantic sweep and unabashed audience-rocking
joy that made it stand out like a boulder amongst grains of sand. Audiences
in the Seventies were getting fed up with anti-heroes and unpleasantness
for its own sake; they still had a thirst for heroes, for a real sense of
good guys 'n bad guys. STAR WARS slaked that thirst, but by playing
straight and sweet rather than stupid.
Aside from being possibly the ultimate movie experience -- emotional and
visceral -- this time, STAR WARS surprised me with how subtle a good deal
of it is, something I attribute to seeing the movie after what feels like a
whole other lifetime of experience. Many of the movie's best moments are
sub-verbal and even subliminal. When Ben (Obi-Wan) Kenobi (the inimitable
Alec Guinness, in a role he at first refused to take) presents Luke
Skywalker (Mark Hammill) with his father's lightsaber, Luke turns it on
without even being told how. Such is destiny. And when Ben perks up at the
mention of the name Obi-Wan, and Luke asks him "Is he dead?", Ben looks
sidelong and says, "Oh, he's not dead. Not yet," in a way that forebodes
everything and nothing.
Han Solo (Harrison Ford, looking impossibly young) is another character
who's easy to misread as a stereotype. Look carefully at the scene between
him and Luke before the attack on the Death Star. Han does not sound like
he's convinced of his own greed; he sounds angry and recriminative, and his
parting line to Luke -- "May the Force be with you" -- tells us that his
thoughts and his actions, and his heart, are very deeply divided indeed.
The relationship with Leia (Carrie Fisher) is divded between bickering and
backslapping, but it's the germ of the developments to come between them in
THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK. (Another thing that comes to mind on watching the
movie is how well it fits in as part of a larger whole. We learn just
enough to know there is a larger story, and sidelong references get spun
out into a great deal more in the succeeding movies.)
There has been a good deal, both good and bad, written about the way the
movie has been reworked. For the most part, the changes are positive --
they didn't change anything that wasn't broken to begin with, so to speak.
I will not ruin any surprises (of which there are more than a few), but I
will say that the best scenes, the ones that worked as is, are all still
the same: The lightsaber duel. The chess game. The 'droid scrapheap. All of
these touches were technology in the service of a carefully deployed story.
In a couple of places, there have been changes to more thoroughly evoke an
atmopshere (the changes to Mos Eiseley are jawdropping and nicely done), or
to replace an effect which didn't work as well the first time (the ships
leaving from the rebel base to attack the Death Star).
In many cases, they left in things that were just pure craftsmanship. The
now-primitive computer animation used to render the Death Star attack
plans, for instance, were considered state-of-the-art then, and were more
or less designed by hand. They were a labor of love for those who created
them, and updating them would have been pointless; hence, they have been
left intact. Also untouched: a good deal of the modelwork, which was
groundbreaking then and still terrifically exciting now, probably because
we *care* about what's happening to these people. It's not just another
sound-and-light show.
This is the real reason this movie commands such joyful respect. In a way
which is still unique and unmatched, George Lucas put together a high-tech
fireside to tell us a hell of a story. And it is still a hell of a story.

Author
Andrew Plotkin
Finally -- the long-awaited new release of this classic! But, as I'm
sure you've heard, with a difference. The director, George Lucas, has
undertaken a bold experiment: a full, unabridged, four-hour-long version
of _Star Wars_.
We all know the story. Young Luke Skywalker lives in a remote desert
manor on Tattooine, with his aunt and uncle. But a mysterious message
from a ghostly apparition jars him out his everyday life; and soon he
learns of the dark figure that murdered his father Old Luke. And Luke
vows revenge. Thus is set the stage for a story of starships,
swordfights, vengeance, and plays within plays.
Luke quickly gathers around him a motley crew as familiar to modern
viewers as the Raskellar Gang. His old companions, Artoo Detoo and See
Threepenstern, are summoned to find out why he is suddenly so keen to
leave the moisture farm and go haring off across the galaxy. The old
adviser, Ben Kenobi, tutors Luke in the ways of the Force. Han Solo, a
disreputable smuggler and son of Kenobi, offers his battered old
freighter, the trusty Millennium Handsaw. And, of course, there is the
beautiful princess, Solo's sister, who has been kidnapped by the evil
King.
The setting of the film is simply gorgeous. The looming, shadowy towers
of Elsinore were a special-effects marvel twenty years ago; they can
honestly be said to have created the modern science fiction movie. But
director Ken Lucas has completely redone the effects for this release.
An opulent European manor forms the stage for this tragedy, replete with
moldering libraries, secret passages, marble balustrades, and -- the
heart of the story -- the central hall, the hall of mirrors, where the
action returns to again and again. The Princess is imprisoned in a
padded cell behind these mirrors; the dark King and his Grand Moff
Norway conceal themselves there to spy on young Luke. When our heros are
about to be crushed in a pirate compactor, the robots, Artoo Denkrantz
and Guildenstepio, save them by interfacing with the program controls
behind these mirrors, and inverting the execution polarity.
It's an all-star cast, of course. Mark Hamill is the lead, partnered by
Robin Williams as Han Solo, Tim Roth and Gary Oldman as the robots, and
Ophelia (created by Jim Henson's Creature Workshop.) But there are any
number of excellent smaller roles, as well. Who can forget Frank Oz as
the aged councillor Kenobi, with his fractured syntax, squeaking,
"Wisdom, you seek? When Vader you have faced, then a Jedi, you will be.
To thine own self, be true!" Or Richard Attenborough as the leering
courtier, Osric the Wookiee?
And, even at four hours in length, the pacing doesn't flag for a moment.
Running gun-battles in the hallways, the fiery saber-duel at the climax,
and of course Luke's desperate run down the trench to pour poison into
the Death Star's ear. All underscored with Walter Jon Williams'
transcendent orchestral music. Shakespeare's literary jewel has never
had a more flamboyant setting than this one; director George Branagh has
achieved a five-star triumph.

Author
Dragan Antulov
Countries and legal systems that take the Rule of Law
principle seriously, had forbidden judges and juries to make
judgements in all matters that could involve them
personally. Luckily, movie reviewers aren't burdened with
such legislation. Otherwise, small pool of very special
movies would be forever ignored by this reviewer. In case of
STAR WARS, 1977 science fiction epic by George Lucas, the
consequences would be even more severe, because that film is
very special for tens of millions, if not hundreds of
millions of fans. In any case, objectivity is something
seldom seen in STAR WARS reviews, because undisputed
majority of reviewers rate it as one of the best, if not the
best film of all times. Those who don't usually have some
difficulties in hiding their artistic snobbery.
The author of this review must also concede his inability to
use cold, objective standards in reviewing this film. Like
so many previous reviewers, I must note that I watched STAR
WARS for the first time twenty years ago, and that I
remained enchanted by the experience ever since. Perhaps it
was childlike fascination with, until then unimaginable,
wonders that happened long time ago, in a galaxy far away.
Or perhaps it was the rush I felt minutes before the opening
shots, with my expectations already pumped up by serialised
comic books and novelisation I had read before. Anyway,
watching of STAR WARS was one of the most important movie
going experiences of my life. And it was also unmatched for
many years to come, because very few movies managed to have
such a strong impact on me like George Lucas' epic.
STAR WARS wasn't just important movie for me (or the
millions of fans who probably share the same sentiment). It
was the defining moment in the history of modern cinema.
Until than, American motion picture industry was in a limbo;
social turmoil in 1960s practically destroyed the Old
Hollywood, and new authors filled the void, mostly by using
Hollywood's financial and technical resources to create
serious, "personal" or "artsy" movies. As a result,
audience, traumatised of dark reality of Vietnam and
Watergate, didn't want to see the same dark and serious
content on the silver screen. George Lucas with its science
fiction epic was among the first to come into rescue. The
audience responded with unprecedented enthusiasm, and huge
financial success of the movie, later backed by supplement
industry of toys, books, comics, role playing games and
other merchandise, slowly began to change the face of
Hollywood. Serious, adult movies with artistic ambitions
faded into oblivion, and were replaced by industrial
products of "blockbuster" philosophy.
One of the biggest casualties of that trend was the science
fiction movie genre. Until 1977, science fiction movies were
mostly in B-production domain. In late 1960s, bigger budgets
for science fiction didn't look so strange anymore, thanks
to the great success of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY. But the same
success coincided with the surge of pesimism, and Hollywood
science fiction was as bleak as the rest of its production -
mostly dark, dystopic movies. However, in 1977 STAR WARS
showed once and for all that this genre can be inspiration
for popular movies, even among the audience that usually
doesn't like it. As a result, seriousness in cinematic
science fiction began fading away, although some good, dark
and cult quality SF and continued to be filmed until early
1980s. After that, science fiction continued to be
considered a synonym for family entertainment.
Ironically, the man responsible for STAR WARS was in its
time considered to be member of "New Hollywood" generation
of young movie authors who made "artsy" and "personal" films
in early 1970s. George Lucas established himself with the
dystopic SF movie THX 1138, and nostalgic drama AMERICAN
GRAFFITI. Both movies were considered "personal" in its
time, despite latter one becoming very popular. In a sense,
STAR WARS is an also very "personal" film, and the thorny
way to the final production shows that commercial
considerations were against it, not for it. But unlike many
"personal" movies of the era, its "personality" was in line
with the wishes of the general audience.
The plot, set "a long time ago, in a galaxy far away",
begins in a time of civil war. The evil Empire is threatened
by rebels who want to restore the old Republic. In order to
quash any opposition, the Empire had built Death Star,
superweapon powerful enough to destroy whole planets. The
information about Death Star, acquired by Rebel
intelligence, is being transported by Princess Leia Organa
(Carrie Fisher) when her ship gets intercepted by Imperial
cruiser. Princess is arrested by Imperial warlord Darth
Vader (played by David Prowse and voice by James Earl
Jones), but the information is being sent to nearby desert
planet of Tatooine via two humanoid robots - C3PO (Anthony
Daniels) and R2D2 (Kenny Baker). Those two robots are sold
to the family of Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), young
restless man who wants to leave his farm and become space
pilot. His adventure begins when R2D2 escapes, because the
information must reach mysterious local hermit Obi Wan
Kenobi (Alec Guiness). Old man is actually the last
surviving Jedi knight, member of the ancient order that
defended Republic through the use of mystical Force. After
some hesitation, Luke agrees to join Obi Wan in his mission
to save the Princess, while the old man would teach him the
ways of the Force. Their small band comes to the colourful
spaceport of Moss Eisely, where they hire the spaceship
owned by rogue pilot Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and his furry
sidekick Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew).
Critics who don't like the movie, especially those who can't
forgive Lucas for his contribution to the quashing of "New
Hollywood", are prone to point the lack of originality. On
the surface, they might be right; Lucas himself admits that
he found a lot of inspiration in the lore of Old Hollywood -
westerns, WWII aviation movies, old SF cliffhanger serials
of the 1930s and 1940s; yet the most obvious element would
be Akira Kurosawa's samurai classic THE HIDDEN FORTRESS. On
the other hand, those who had spent last two decades
studying the movie to death would say that the inspiration
for STAR WARS went even further - into collective
subconscious of Western civilisation (hinted by some mild
Tolkien references). The others would find the author's
element within the story - STAR WARS could be seen as an
anti- establishment film; young, long-haired, easy going,
nature-loving heroes are fighting against old, uptight and
oppressive forces who use supertechnology in most demonic
purposes.
Even out of its historical or social context, STAR WARS is
an impressive as a strictly technical piece of the seven
art. George Lucas' direction is very good, with the clever
editing and a well-paced segments between action and
dramatic buildup. Characters are well-drawn and deliver all
the necessary ingredients, both for the space opera and
Hollywood blockbuster. We have a "coming-of-age" hero,
damsel-in-distress (somewhat toned down due to the popular
feminist trends of the time), reluctant helper, benevolent
mentor, diabolical villain and, finally, comic relief in
form of two non-human characters. Some of the actors are
very good - Alec Guiness in his most famous role to date,
James Earl Jones whose voice is enough to cause unease,
Peter Cushing as an incarnation of pure evil in human form.
Unfortunately, the same can't be said for the main leads -
among the main trio of Mark Hamill, Carrie Fisher and
Harrison Ford, only the last one had the character
three-dimensional enough to launch his further acting
career.
The thing that looked like the most important segment of
STAR WARS phenomena during its initial release was the new
level of special effects technology. Often comparisons with
2001: SPACE ODYSSEY, another ground-breaking SF film, were
citing the sheer number of effects as a proof of the Lucas'
superiority over Kubrick. However, the special effects by
John Dykstra and John Stears are indeed impressive, even
after two decades (although 1997 Special Edition did improve
them significantly), yet they aren't the most remembered
trademark of the movie. That honour should definitely go to
the "Oscar"-winning soundtrack by John Williams, whose work
on STAR WARS is probably the brightest gem in his brilliant
career.
Newer generations of viewers might be somewhat deprived of
the enchantment that still holds those lucky enough to
witness STAR WARS original release. Yet, even if they are
immune to the George Lucas' magic they should watch this
film nevertheless, perhaps only to become familiar with
something that is essential part of contemporary culture.

Author
DeWyNGaLe
STAR WARS EPISODE IV: A NEW HOPE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
In 1977, something never though possible happened.  The film Star Wars was
released, with extraordinary, never seen before techniques of special effects. 
The film set a new standard for special effects in film.  Not only did it set a
standard for the special effects, it set a standard for film itself.  The plot
is one of the most creative I heard ever.  The legend of Star Wars starts long
ago with the Jedi.  The Jedi were warriors who were wiped out by the dark side.
 Darth Vader is the leader of the dark side.  Ben Obi-Wan Kenobi, played by Sir
Alec Guinness, was one of those Jedi who is still alive today.  Darth Vader was
once a Jedi, until he turned to the dark side.  Years after the killing of the
Jedi, Darth Vader is still around causing trouble.  
R2-D2 and C-3P0 are both what we call "driods", or robots that are of
assistance to humans.  While an attack on the ship that Princess Leia, played
by Carrie Fisher, is aboard, she inserts a message to R2-D2, who is also on the
ship. to Obi-Wan Kenobi pleading for help.  The Princess is captured by Vader,
but R2-D2 and C-3P0 get away on an escape pod that eventually lands them on the
remote planet of Tatooine.  The Jawas, or small creatures who sell droids, pick
R2-D2 and C-3P0 up to sell.  They are bought by Luke Skywalker's (Mark Hamill)
family.  While Luke is cleaning the droids, the message from Princess Leia is
found.  Luke finds this Obi-Wan Kenobi, and learns that Obi-Wan was a friend of
Luke's father, who is now dead.  Luke also learns his family was a Jedi.
After Luke's family is killed by tropps from the dark side, Ben decides to put
Luke through training to stop the dark side and destroy them once and for all. 
Ben wants to create a new Jedi.  First, the two must find Princess Leia and
serve her.  Han Solo, played by Harrison Ford, and his sidekick Chewbacca,
played by Peter Mayhew, are consulted about providing a ship to complete the
tasks necessary.  After meeting up with Leia, the film really picks up.  Luke
continues his training as a pilot and to become a Jedi, Ben Kenobi confronts
Darth Vader, and many other interesting events occur. 
Star Wars is an amazing epic.  The plot is so original and amazing, I cannot
believe it.  The special effects, especially for its time, are wonderful and
realistic.  The space scenes in particular are the most fun to watch.  The
ships flown by all are very unique and creative.  The costumes are also out of
this world.  The scenery is so different from anything I have ever seen before.
 There are a variety of different very memorable set pieces that will stay with
me forever.    
The entire premise of Star Wars is amazing.  The creatures and droids that we
see throughout the film are one of a kind.  Even the human characters are
different.  Every character is extremely likable and different from characters
from other sci fi films.  The acting on everyone's part is great, especially
that of Sir Alec Guinness's.  
Even though the concept is not realistic at all, it is pulled off very nicely. 
The acting, setting, effects, costumes, and sound make it work.  If any of
these were messed up, Star Wars would have come off as one huge joke.  The
ending works very well, and left it very open to the sequels that came
afterward.  In early 1997, a special edition of Star Wars was released.  The
film was re-mastered so it looked better than it did in 1977.  A few creatures
were added here and there, and even an entire deleted scene with Han Solo and
Jabba The Hutt (seen in Return Of The Jedi) was added to the film.  Think
that's enough?  On May 19, 1999, Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace will
be released, followed by two more films that will reveal what went on before A
New Hope.  With this, Star Wars is bound to become the greatest tale told in
our time.

Author
Walter Frith
It would be ludicrous to tell the world anything about the plot of
'Star Wars'.  The 1977 film which won six Academy Awards, the most of
any film that year (Sound, Film Editing, Art Direction/Set Decoration,
Costume Design, Original Score, and Special Visual Effects) has
returned and Special Edition refers not only to its restoration but
also its enhancement.  What beat it out for Best Picture, Best Director
and Best Original Screenplay?  'Annie Hall', Woody Allen for 'Annie
Hall', and Woody Allen and Marshall Brickman for 'Annie Hall'.  Alec
Guinness (who turned down the role of Obi-Won Kenobi several times
before Lucas convinced him to take it) was edged out for Best
Supporting Actor by Jason Robards for 'Julia'.  It actually is the
recipient of seven Oscars as a special achievement award for Sound
Effects was given to Benjamin Burtt, Jr. for the creation of the alien,
creature and robot voices but this was a non-competitive category.
George Lucas and 20th Century Fox have invested millions (most reports
indicate $10-15 million) to re-mix the original mono soundtrack which
originally appeared in the credits in 1977 as D OLBY SYSTEM - making
movies sound better for stereo and digital sound at that but the analog
mix can still be differentiated from today's technology.  Dolby Stereo
movies actually hit screens in 1978 with 'Superman' and 'The Deer
Hunter' being two classics with that new technology and 'The Deer
Hunter' won the Oscar for sound that year.  The 'Star Wars' negative
has also been cleaned up (although the print that I viewed had some
colour contrast problems).  It isn't quite twenty years since 'Star
Wars' hit the big screen.  It actually debuted in May of 1977 but they
are doing the right thing by re-releasing it now because from May of
1997 right through to the fall, we will be bombarded with
multi-blockbuster hits such as the fourth 'Batman' movie and Steven
Spielberg's sequel to 'Jurassic Park'.  'The Empire Strikes Back' is
due for re-release on February 21st and 'Return of the Jedi' finishes
off the space western trilogy with re-release on March 7th.  There is
approximately four and a half minutes of new footage included this time
in 'Star Wars' with a conversation between Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and
Jabba the Hut who looks smaller than he appeared in 'Return of the
Jedi' and since it is a computer enhanced Jabba this time, he moves
much more quickly than 'Jedi's' Jabba who was slower because he was a
puppet.  Actually, a super puppet :-)  The other additional scene has
Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) talking to one of his star fighter buddies
before the climax occurs which is the attack on the Death Star.  So
much for the additions.  As for the enhancements, there are scenes from
the first movie that have background additions such as flying objects,
live action creatures and new laser effects from the weapon known as
the 'blaster'.  Purists have complained that Lucas should never have
tampered with the original but as someone who has seen the film over 50
times, I had no problem with it and I think they've done a good job to
keep the film above date and it does stand up remarkably well twenty
years after the fact.  Endless imitations followed 'Star Wars' and most
of them flopped ('Battlestar Galactica', 'Buck Rogers in the 25th
Century' and 'Flash Gordon') but 'Star Wars' was a revolutionary
contribution to society's pop culture and influenced other outer space
creations such as the return of the 'Star Trek' series which went from
the small screen to the big one, the invention of the 'Alien' series,
'E.T., The Extra-Terrestrial', and no doubt today's 'The X-Files' which
is arguably the best program on television for its combination of
Earthly crime, outer space connection and paranormal activity.  'Star
Wars: Special Edition' is a grand opportunity for everyone to enjoy it
all over again and for a new generation to experience a wonder which
will remain just as strong in 2077 as it does today.

Author
Dean Jones
Writer/Director: George Lucus
Cast: Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie Fisher, Peter Cushing, Alec
Guiness.
I saw this at the cinema at its original release in 1977.  The main thing I
remember is stars spinning around the entire cinema at the start of the
film - very futuristic for then - and some great fighting scenes.  There
was little else to the film through the eyes of an eleven year old.
Twenty years later I decided the time was right to give it a second chance.
  Though this time the reissued special edition on video. 
The story is basically good against evil, Luke Skywalker versus Darth
Vadar.  This is blatantly obvious; pure young boy in white (who walks on
clouds - Skywalker) opposes nasty older guy in all black (death invader). 
Darth Vadar takes Princess Leia (damsel in distress) from her space ship. 
Luckily, because without this link the story would not work, two robots
escape from the ship.  They end up recruiting Luke Skywalker; who soon has
three reasons to help, namely: he sees an image of Princess Leia and feels
the urge to rescue the damsel in distress; is  guardians are killed by
Darth Vadar's evil forces; and he romanticises about being a fighter. They
are then joined by Obi-one Kenobi a Jedi Knight (an up to date samurai). 
Next the four get help from Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and his pal, borrowed
from the 'Planet of the Apes', Chewbacca.  All six end up at the home of
Darth Vadar and his equally bad cronies on the Death Star, a grand battle
commences and our good guys kick ass. 
There are, in my opinion, two bad points in this film: firstly, the
Characters, all but one, are definitely not Dickensian they are flat,
non-dimensional, unemotional and never develop.  Though there is one saving
grace, namely Han Solo played by Harrison Ford who never makes a bad film
(note - he remained the successful actor out of the main three).  He plays
the likable rogue that everybody knows is going to come good at the end. 
Having said this there is some interesting character contrasts and
relationships:  There's the obvious Darth Vadar/Obi-one Kenobi battle, and
Luke Skywalker/Darth Vadar good versus evil relationship.  And also
Princess Leia/Han Solo feminist versus chauvinist relationship, and Darth
Vadar/Han Solo good turned bad/bad turned good.
The second failing of this film is its lack of keeping the viewers
attention in parts, admittedly most of the film is action and has enough
plot to make you want to watch it unfold.  The main scene in question is
where they are on Planet Tatooine, this planet is like the film at this
stage, desolate.  The robots are all we have on offer for approximately 15
minutes, I even considered somebody had taped 'Lost In Space' over the top
of this copy of the video.
However, there are many good points: My favourite being the futuristic
chess type board game, this looks brilliant, fits the film perfectly and
produces good humour when Han Solo points out what happens if Chewbacca
loses.
The bar scene is also good, it again shows good special effects and
provides the perfect opportunity to introduce Han Solo in a natural habitat
for his character.
The 'Force' provides an element of intrigue and mysticism to the film.  It
nicely lurks in the background and is never overplayed.  Without the Force
the film would not work as well, it would become too real, instead of a
fantasy. 
The scene in which Princess Leia, Luke Skywalker and Han Solo end up in the
garbage should have been another high point of the film, perhaps in the
hands of Hitchcock it would have been.  The scene itself represents a low
point for our heroes, with a rare piece of symbolism, i.e. getting crushed,
thrown away like rubbish, which works well because it further emphasises
the film moments later when in contrast they defeat the Death Star.
I think it may be another twenty years before I watch this film again and
who knows it may be even further enhanced - a kind of special, special
edition.

Author
Yamamoto
There I was, chillin' as usual and walking down the street.  And guess
what I get?  This Mormon guy comes up to me and start preaching about
their belief and everything.  What really bothered me was that the guy
was carrying a Russian bible.  Talk about redundant.  Anyhow, I escaped
their grasp.
Speaking of being born again, STAR WARS came out and I had to go check
it out.  You know the story, it's about the good vs the evil.  Throw in
the princess in distress, two goofy rescuers and a wise ol' teacher.
Yeah, it's what the legends are made of.  And no, it never gets tired.
And the edits and the added scenes are really cool.
No nakkid boobs.  No bullets (but with bullet sounds).  Kazillion dead
bodies.  12 on the vomit meter.  No moon shots.  What we got here are:
In the galaxy far far away-fu, attack of killer star destroyer-fu,
storm troopers-fu, Mr Darth-fu, droids from hell-fu, elephants in
rags-fu, little rats-fu, more star destroyers-fu, astroids from
hell-fu, attack of killer death star-fu, and of course, the force- fu.
Video hall of fame nominations to Harrison Ford for saying stuff like
"May the Force be with you" and to Mark Hamill for saying stuff like "I
want to learn about the force".  And of course to Carrie Fisher for
saying stuff like "You listen to me, got it?" and to Alec Guiness for
saying stuff like "Use the Force Luke".  Four stars.  Shaggy Bobs says
wicked!
Spoilers -- There was once a wise man who told me this -- digital means
you can play it loud! (without distortion)  Go see it on the big screen
with good sound system.  It's the whole reason why you want to go see
it.  Ok, the added scenes are cool.  And they did a good job editing
the special effects.  But Star Wars is one of the few movies that has
that certain magic.  And you won't get most out of it unless you see it
on the big screen.  If you're waiting for the phone call from Rachel
Blanchard, just call her up and take her to see this movie.  She won't
hate you for it.  Well, that's assuming that you already know her and
you're not being a pain.
Alien Alert!  What's this I hear about da mayor wanting to bring
Steinheart to SOMA?  Just what goes through morons' minds (if there is
any)?  Hello?  Oh, I forgot, we're talking about people who'd demolish
freeway one level at a time and never replace them.  Just once, I'd
like to hear about sound decisions.  I guess I'll be dead before that
but I can always dream can't I?
For wisdom according to Shaggy Bob, hit that Reply key now.

Author
Brian Koller
What can be said about "Star Wars" that hasn't been
said already?  It finished its lengthy theatrical run
in 1977 as the highest grossing movie of all time,
then reclaimed that title with another massively
successful re-release in 1997.  The two films that
have replaced "Star Wars" atop the all-time Box Office
charts, "E.T. the Extra Terrestial" and "Titanic",
also relied heavily on special effects.  This was
the true impact of "Star Wars" and its many sequels:
it raised the bar for audience expectations of
blockbusters.  No longer was a great story sufficient,
as it was for "The Godfather" in 1972.
I doubt that anybody reading this hasn't seen the
film, but a plot summary is obligatory.  Luke Skywalker
(Mark Hamill) is an excitable, idealistic young man
who lives with his 'uncle' as a farmer on the remote
planet of Tatooine.  He hungers for adventure, and
gets his wish when he encounters Obi-Won Kenobi
(Alec Guinness).  Kenobi endeavors to train him as
a Jedi, a master of a universal 'force' that can be
used for good or evil.
Skywalker and Kenobi hire Han Solo (Harrison Ford),
who is a mercenary with a heart of gold, to help
deliver 'death star' plans stored in the robot
R2-D2.  Solo's sidekick is 'walking carpet'
Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew), and R2-D2's sidekick is
comic relief C-3PO (Anthony Daniels).  Along the
way our heroes rescue beautiful but independent
Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher) from the clutches of
imposing, panting Darth Vader (voiced by James
Earl Jones).
"Star Wars" is refreshingly innocent, lacking
the cynicism common to 1970s films.  With its
good versus evil theme, it is easy to criticize
the story as simplistic.  But the plot is
elaborate, and the depth of the main characters
has been underrated.  Luke, for instance, may
be a goody-goody, but his boundless faith in
Kenobi and his unjaded enthusiasm for adventure
is winning.
As far as genre goes, the "Star Wars" series seems
derived principally from "Flash Gordon" 1930s serials,
albeit with far greater production values.  But
the thrills of the old serials are lost on adults,
who can see through the hokey script and sets, while
only the most stubbornly snobbish viewer can disregard
the magic of "Star Wars".  Except for a gratuitous
awards ceremony at films end, this is one blockbuster
that really delivers.
"Star Wars" received 11 Academy Awards, winning
in all the technical categories (sets, score, sound,
editing, costumes) but losing in the major
categories (Best Picture, Best Original Screenplay,
Best Director, Best Supporting Actor (Guiness)).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Scott Renshaw
     The impact of STAR WARS on those who are writing about movies today
can be measured by the number of reviews or articles of the past few
months which began as follows:  "I was x years old in 1977..."  The
release of George Lucas' seminal blockbuster 20 years ago was the kind of
happening which affected a generation of movie-goers, and I include myself
in that generation.  I was 10 years old in 1977, and when you were 10
years old in 1977 you were not judged by whether you had seen STAR WARS;
you were judged by how many _times_ you had seen STAR WARS.  It awed us,
it delighted us...and yes, hyperbolic though it might seem to say so, it
changed us.
     As much as it changed the people who watched movies, however, it
changed the people who made movies even more.  Hollywood heads were sent
spinning by the success of STAR WARS, a film with no stars, a simplistic
story-line out of old Westerns and some nifty special effects.  It was not
long before studio executives realized that two fundamental lessons of
STAR WARS could be translated to other films:  1) If you made a special
effects-laden adventure with a modicum of skill and dropped it into your
summer release schedule, when young potential movie-goers had summer job
money burning holes in their pockets, they would come and come again,
story be damned; 2) One successful film could turn into one or two more,
plus action figures, lunchboxes and T-shirts (the twin goddesses of
Franchising and Merchandising).  And thus STAR WARS begat the "event
film," which begat BATMAN, which begat TWISTER and INDEPENDENCE DAY.  And
they slew the medium-budget film, and there was much wailing and gnashing
of teeth.
     You can't really blame Lucas for what has happened to American
film-making, though, because there is no way he intended for crass
commercial concerns to become so dominant.  There is no way STAR WARS
could have worked if he _had_ had such an intention.  Lost in all the ink
spilled with references to Joseph Campbell, back-brain mythopoetics and
anti-technological humanism is the fact that STAR WARS was not a great
movie.  The most surprising thing a viewer might find in the SPECIAL
EDITION has nothing to do with with the dozens of critters tossed into the
backgrounds, but rather how restless he might get waiting through the
first half.  For nearly an hour, STAR WARS is characterized by the fussy
quarrelsomeness of C-3P0 (Anthony Daniels), the intergalactic Leo
Buscaglia sermonizing of Ben Kenobi (Alec Guinness) and the laughably
petulant plea by Luke (Mark Hamill) to "go to Tashi Station and pick up
some power converters.  STAR WARS wasn't a great movie; it was, however,
an extraordinary movie-going experience.  You sat in a theater with a few
hundred other people and for two hours you were utterly transported,
because it was innocent in a way no film can ever be innocent again.  You
felt as though you were part of something joyous, a celebration of cinema
as fantasy and a celebration of good triumphing over evil.  In an era when
you can see the veins bulging on big-budget action films as they strain to
impress you, STAR WARS was effortless in its enchantment.
     That movie-going experience is what this re-release is all about.
The difference between STAR WARS on the big screen and STAR WARS on the
small screen is the difference between Mount Rushmore and a picture of
Mount Rushmore, between Wagner on a cassette deck and Wagner played by a
symphony orchestra.  If there is an element of not-inconsequential element
of nostalgia in the way crowds will flock to this re-release, that is
understandable; many will be hoping to re-capture a youthful moment when
they fell in love with movies for the first time.  STAR WARS: SPECIAL
EDITION may end up disappointing those who come to it as though on a
pilgrimage, but the dazzling editing of the climactic trench run will
certainly remind anyone who has seen what passes for a "spectacular" in
the last few years how exciting a science-fiction adventure film can be.
     There has been some consternation over the idea of Lucas fiddling
with such a cherished film, but frankly, I don't understand all the fuss.
This isn't a case of someone whose only connection with a film is
ownership of its rights deciding to colorize it; this is a director's
attempt to realize the vision he always had for his film, a fairly common
practice in an era of "Director's Cut" video and laserdisc releases.  Some
of the new additions are merely window dressing, including Han Solo's
(Harrison Ford) encounter with Jabba the Hutt; others, like a scene
between Luke and his friend Biggs (Garrick Hagon) help set up later scenes
more effectively.  But if anything Lucas has done threatens someone's
memories of a first experience of STAR WARS, I can only suggest that the
experience couldn't have been terribly profound.  In terms of the details,
this is a different STAR WARS, but it is the spirit of this story which
has moved people for twenty years.  Now they have the opportunity to come
once again -- some with their children -- and visit that galazy far, far
away.

Author
James W. Otis
It's been 20 years since Star Wars premiered. What started as a low- budget
Sci-Fi movie turned into a cultural icon for two generations. Now the movie 
back where it was intended to be, on the big screen. 
What makes the re-release of Star Wars impressive isn't the fact that only a
handful of movies have ever seen a big screen more than once. Instead, it's 
the major and minor changes that have been made to the film. 
When Star Wars opened on May 25, 1977, it had been made with a budget of only
$10 million, of which only $2 million had been set aside for the 
film's special effects. Even when the film opened 20 years ago, writer/ 
director George Lucas spoke of how he felt the film wasn't where he had hoped 
it would be in regards to the special effects. Twenty years later, 
Lucas finally has the technology to accomplish that wish. 
With a budget of $10 million, Lucas has given his team at Industrial Lights &
Magic (ILM) the charge to go back and create Star Wars: Special Edition. 
A long list of improvements was made. 
The first improvement was the original. After 20 years, the original was in
surprisingly bad shape, and a crew of technicians reportedly spent months 
cleaning each cell painstakingly by hand with a small sponge. The end result
are colors that are more vivid and true to the original. 
Next came the improvement to the sound of the film. When Star Wars first came
out, there were just two options for sound, stereo and mono. Now there 
are such techniques as THX, Dolby Surround Sound and DTS. The digital
enhancements made to the sound are reported to have made the film the best
sounding that it has ever been. 
Most of the attention for the film's changes have been in the special effects
area. Only four and one-half minutes of footage has been changed, small things 
such as two more aliens being introduced at the cantina in Mos Eisley
Spaceport and a new exterior shot of Ben (Obi-Wan) Kenobi's home. But what 
has drawn most of the attention(and controversy) are three major 
sequences in the film. 
The first is Mos Eisley spaceport. As the character Ben Kenobi says in the
movie, "You will never find a more wretched hive of scum and villainy. 
We must be cautious." In the original version, Mos Eisley looked like nothing
more than a small town filmed in the desert (Arizona to be exact), not the
"wretched hive of scum and villainy" that we were warned of. The Special 
Edition takes care of that. Computer-generated images (CGI) of various animals,
robots and space craft have been added. These were made in addition to
completely new scenes of Luke Skywalker flying around on his hover car 
that were created entirely within the computer. 
Next is Jabba the Hutt. In the original script, the character Han Solo was
supposed to have a meeting with Jabba to discuss the money that Solo owed 
Jabba. The original film never had this scene because the technology wasn't
available. Creating a smaller Jabba (roughly half the size of Jabba seen in
Return of the Jedi) through CGI, Solo is now seen interacting with the huge 
gangster-like slug. This scene has caused quite a bit of controversy
among fans of the original film. Most claim that in the scene, Jabba appears as
nothing more than a half-sized gangster wannabe. Despite these claims, 
Lucas maintains that the scene adds to, instead of detracts from the
Trilogy's presence. 
The last major change made to the film comes in the dogfight finale. The
fighters, which swoop and dodge around, create more of a theme-ride feel to 
the movie. The picture has also been cleaned up, removing matte lines and
motion blurs. The end result is a dog fight that feels more like combat in
space than ever before. 
When Star Wars first came out there were many doubts as to how well the 
picture would perform. This is evident in the mere 32 screens that first 
premiered the film. Now, 20 years later, those concerns are brought up again. Many
Hollywood executives question whether or not the new Special Edition will be
successful. They feel that since most audience members have already seen the 
film and own the videos, that no one will be interested in seeing it again. 
However, the $36.2 million that the film made opening weekend is proof enough
that Star Wars' popularity has reached a status of cultural icon. 
It has been almost 15 years since the last film in the Trilogy (Star Wars,
Empire Strikes Back, and Return of the Jedi) was made. With the last two 
movies being released later this year, Empire Strikes Back on February 21 and
Return of the Jedi on March 7, many have asked the question, "What's next?" 
The answer will come at the close of the century when Lucas debuts the first of
three "prequels" in 1999. The movies will follow the fall of Darth Vader to 
the "dark side of the force." The audience will be given new pieces to the 
puzzle that Lucas has created. The third "prequel" will finish at about the
beginning of the film that started it all, Star Wars.

Author
James Berardinelli
United States, 1997 (original 1977)
Release date: 5/25/77 (wide)
Special Edition Release date: 1/31/97 (wide)
Running Length (special edition): 2:09
MPAA Classification: PG (Mild violence)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 2.35:1
Cast: Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie Fisher, Alec Guinness, 
      Peter Cushing, Anthony Daniels, Peter Mayhew, David Prowse, 
      Kenny Baker, voice of James Earl Jones
Director: George Lucas
Producer: Gary Kurtz
Screenplay: George Lucas
Cinematography: Gilbert Taylor
Music: John Williams
U.S. Distributor: 20th Century Fox
     When one examines the roster of the tens of thousands of motion 
pictures produced since the late 1800s, not many stand out as 
trailblazers.  One of the few inarguable members of that select cadre is 
George Lucas' soaring 1977 space opera, STAR WARS (or, as it has since 
become known, STAR WARS:  A NEW HOPE).  Not only is this film a rousing 
adventure, but, upon its initial release, it revived science fiction as 
a viable movie medium, and, most importantly, began a special effects 
revolution that is still going on.  Industrial Lights and Magic, the 
premiere special effects house of the '80s and '90s, was born as a 
result of STAR WARS, and its manifest contributions to the industry have 
included everything from making the Starship Enterprise fly to breathing 
life into the dinosaurs of JURASSIC PARK.  It's impossible to estimate 
the full ramifications of STAR WARS, but that single movie has surely 
influenced much about the making and marketing of motion pictures over 
the last two decades.
     When STAR WARS was first released on the Wednesday before Memorial 
Day in 1977, it arrived in theaters with good reviews and excellent 
advance word.  It didn't take long for it to become a phenomenon 
(although, admittedly, 1997's publicity for the SPECIAL EDITION dwarves 
that of the original 1977 release).  It was a true family film -- 
perfect for kids and parents, a throwback to the space serials of the 
past and a look ahead to what the future might hold.  Adults appreciated 
Lucas' masterful, magical movie-making.  Children loved all the strange 
creatures.  Suddenly, STAR WARS was everywhere; there were bed sheets, 
lunch boxes, trading cards, action figures, comic books, picture books, 
posters, records, and just about anything else you could imagine. 
     The STAR WARS fad, such as it was, lasted into the early '80s, and 
the original film received two additional theatrical runs.  Then it was 
on to the small screen.  But watching the movie on videotape, which has 
been the exclusive viewing experience of just about anyone under the age 
of twenty, isn't the same as seeing it in a packed theater.  Now, 
however, with the advent of the original movie's twentieth anniversary 
and the promise of new films in another two years, STAR WARS is as hot 
as it has ever been.  Those predicting anything less than a financial 
windfall for the SPECIAL EDITION don't have the world's pulse.  
     Every year, a handful of movies are re-released to commemorate an 
anniversary.  All of these feature new, clean prints.  Some have re-
mixed soundtracks.  A few, such as LAWRENCE OF ARABIA, VERTIGO, and THE 
UMBRELLAS OF CHERBOURG, have been painstakingly restored.  But Lucas 
wanted more than this for STAR WARS.  He didn't just want to re-create 
the original theatrical experience, he wanted to improve upon it.  So, 
in addition to cleaning up the print and re-mixing the soundtrack into a 
digital format, he has used state-of-the-art special effects to change 
the film's look.  This includes adding more than four minutes of never-
before-seen footage.  And, while the new scenes don't appreciably 
improve the movie, they're fun to see, especially for anyone who has 
memorized every detail from the original.  More importantly, although 
the newer, flashier effects subtly alter the STAR WARS experience, they 
do not degrade it.
     By now, the heroes -- Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), Han Solo 
(Harrison Ford), Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher), Obi-Wan Kenobi (Alec 
Guinness), Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew), C-3P0 (Anthony Daniels), and R2-D2 
(Kenny Baker) -- are household names.  Equally well-known are the 
villains -- Governor Tarkin (Peter Cushing) and, of course, the Dark 
Lord of the Sith, Darth Vader (David Prowse; voice courtesy of the 
inimitable James Earl Jones).  These characters, familiar types with 
enough unique personality traits to brand them as individuals, have 
become so universally recognized that the mere mention of their names 
almost anywhere in the world will spur a reaction.  
     Another thing that's instantly recognizable about STAR WARS is its 
music.  When George Lucas first approached John Williams for an epic 
score, little did he imagine that the result would sell millions of 
copies and spawn a disco-era radio hit.  Few motion picture themes are 
as well-known and often-played as that of STAR WARS.  Even the music 
from E.T., the current highest-grossing film, doesn't leap as readily to 
mind.  Williams' evocative, grandiose score provides the perfect 
compliment to the STAR WARS visual experience.
     At its heart, STAR WARS is about Luke's quest to join the battle 
against evil.  He doesn't want to be just another bystander while the 
struggle for freedom goes on all around him -- he wants to be a 
participant.  And, when two droids carrying a secret message from a 
beautiful rebel princess fall into his hands, his chance arrives.  
Amidst of the dunes of Luke's home planet of Tatooine, the young man 
meets the aging Jedi Knight, Obi-Wan Kenobi, who teaches of the 
mysterious Force, a mystical energy field that binds together all things 
in the universe.  Obi-Wan convinces Luke to join the droids and him on a 
mission to rescue the princess.  Accompanied by a cynical smuggler, Han 
Solo, and his first mate, the hairy Chewbacca, the odd little group 
blasts off into space, agents of the corrupt Galactic Empire in pursuit.  
Their destination:  the dreaded Imperial Death Star, a confrontation 
with the evil Darth Vader, and motion picture immortality.  
     STAR WARS borrows from numerous sources, but the most obvious 
inspirations are the serialized adventures of Flash Gordon and Buck 
Rogers, Arthurian legends, Greek mythology, and Akira Kurosawa's THE 
HIDDEN FORTRESS.  There are also multiple nods to Westerns and the 
dogfights of World War II movies.  But, like all great craftsmen, Lucas 
has managed to fashion this material in a manner that not only honors 
the original sources, but makes it uniquely his own.  Hacks rip off 
other movies; artists synthesize and pay homage to their inspirations.  
Compare INDEPENDENCE DAY to STAR WARS and the difference will become 
apparent.
     During its original period of theatrical release, STAR WARS' 
special effects were described as everything from "eye popping" to "mind 
blowing".  And, indeed, for their time, they were.  (Keep in mind that 
KING KONG's rather cheesy visuals had won the Academy Award just two 
months before STAR WARS was released.)  In fact, they're not bad even by 
today's standards.  But "not bad" wasn't good enough for Lucas, and his 
vision of what they should have been fills the screen in the SPECIAL 
EDITION.  This is most notable during three key sequences:  Luke and 
Ben's entry into the city of Mos Eisley, Han's heretofore unseen hanger 
bay meeting with Jabba the Hut, and the final attack on the Death Star.  
However, in scenes both with and without effects improvements, STAR WARS 
is just as compelling and invigorating a movie experience today as it 
was when it first came out, and the new stuff blends in seamlessly with 
the old.
     Since 1977, there have been many science fiction movies, but none 
has managed to equal STAR WARS' blend of adventure, likable characters, 
and epic storytelling.  Like some indefatigable King of the Hill, it 
stands alone and triumphant, regardless of the many imitators that 
assail its position.  As is true of CITIZEN KANE, CASABLANCA, and GONE 
WITH THE WIND, STAR WARS will endure long after its creators are gone.  
And watching this new edition today is like coming home after a long 
journey and finding everything just as you remember it -- if not better.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Steve Kong
I was two years old when the original Star Wars: A New Hope was released
theatrically. So, the only exposure of Star Wars, and the subsequent
additions to the story, for me were by video. That is until the Special
Edition of Star Wars, Empire Strikes Back, and Return of The Jedi was
introduced to the big screen.  And because I've been a Star Wars fan ever
since I saw the Death Star trench run on video when I was six or seven, I
was ecstatic when I heard that the Special Edition of the Star Wars Trilogy
was being re-released to the big screen.
To try to tell or synopsize the Star Wars story would be a waste of time.
The story of Star Wars is so ingrained into our culture that it's hard to
find someone who is not familiar with the story and the characters.
Everyone knows about the Death Star, the Millenium Falcon, X-Wings, Tie
Fighters and Star Destroyers. Everyone knows about Luke Skywalker, Han
Solo, Princess Leia, Chewbacca, Darth Vader, C-3P0, and R2-D2. And who can
forget the familiar words, "A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far away"
right before the fanfare music by the great composer John Williams?
George Lucas, on the 20th anniversary of the original release of Star Wars:
A New Hope wanted to "complete" his work. He always felt that his original
release was somewhat "incomplete" because he could not achieve what he
wanted with the technology in 1977. So, now that the digital revolution has
taken Hollywood by storm, Lucas has taken advantage of this new technology
and completed his work.
There are far more additions into Star Wars: A New Hope Special Edition
than into either of the other two. Rightfully so because the original a
much older film than the other two following it. At the time that the
original was being made, Lucas and company had to invent most of the
special effects technology to accomplish much of what was done in the
original film. And to that effect, Lucas and company was also limited to
what they could do with this new technology. With STSE, Lucas is able to go
back and fill in what he could not have done at the time.
Star Wars was more than just special effects though -- unlike most modern
day special effects driven films out of Hollywood -- Star Wars was a film
that balanced the special effects with a story so well told that by itself,
the story could hold the audience's attention. Maybe it is right that STSE
is being re-released 20 years after it originally set the stage for so many
sci-fi special effects driven films. STSE shows how a good sci-fi film does
not need to rest on its special effects, rather a good sci-fi film should
rest on the story.
Star Wars is a classic film that will outlive its creator and the hard
working people who made it happen. And it does deserve this, for it is a
classic film that everyone should see. If you're one of those who hasn't
already seen Star Wars, don't miss this film, in its Special Edition or
original form.  Cheers to George Lucas for introducing the world to such a
wonderful set of characters and to such a great timeless tale.

Author
Michael Redman
There are some images and stories so ingrained in the human psyche that
they are universal throughout the history of the world. Tales of the
flawed hero's quest, stories of boy versus father, fables of rescuing
the captive princess: these are omnipresent in mankind's legends and
religions. And they are the basis for "Star Wars".
Joseph Campbell who spent a lifetime studying myths and their
commonalties in various traditions had high praise for the film. He
talked about the shared themes between the science fiction movie and
those beliefs that dwell deep within the collective unconsciousness.
The Special Edition has been remastered with new effects and the
inclusion of over four minutes of new footage. As cutting edge as the
film was 20 years ago, director George Lucas was unsatisfied with some
of the effects that were underdone due to budget considerations. Now,
with megabucks in his pockets, he has gone back to polish them up.
Most of the new footage fits in seamlessly. The obvious changes are a
scene where Han Solo (a very young soon-to-be-major-star Harrison Ford)
encounters Jabba The Hut and the backwater Mos Eisley spaceport has
become more of a busy place.
Mucking around with a classic is dangerous business, but Lucas has
succeeded in improving the original. True, Jabba seems less impressive
than he does in the later films (seeing him "walk" is believable, but
ruins the image of the hedonistic despot), but the episode still works.
The minor change when Han kills Greedo is the only failure in the new
version. The visuals are clumsy and there is an unneeded change in
Solo's character.
This film changed the movie industry. Spawning dozens of imitators and
the search for bigger effects and even larger budgets, Lucas is
indirectly responsible for most of the major movies from the past two
decades. Of course that was not all good news. Personal films fell by
the wayside only to begin reappearing in recent years. "Star Wars" was
the harbinger of things to come.
Very few films have become such cultural icons. The only other one that
I can think of that _everyone_ has seen is "The Wizard Of Oz". Both
films are not talked about in terms of if one has experienced it, but,
rather how often. In some ways, "Star Wars" is a reworked "Wizard". The
characters match: the tin man, the large furry animal, the wicked witch
of the Empire, the young adventurer searching for truth and tons of
munchkins. Luke even lives on a farm with his auntie.
It's impossible to talk about "Star Wars" as just a film. It is a
cultural phenomenon. The re-release of the first of the middle trilogy
(nine films are planned in all, the new one opens in a few years) will
be followed by "The Empire Strikes Back" and "Return Of The Jedi" within
the next several weeks.
Many of us saw this when it opened in the summer of 1979. If you were
among those, you'll be surprised at how well it holds up. It's still an
amazing spectacle.
If you have only viewed this on your VCR, you absolutely _must_ get
thyself to a theater. Seeing it on a big screen is a completely
different event and one that needs to be experienced. Go to a packed
house and sit near the front. History awaits you.
[This appeared in the "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana 2/6/96.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com ]

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Almost twenty years after I as blown by the sheer majesty of STAR
WARS, my seven year old son Jeffrey has turned from The Power Rangers
to STAR WARS.  This means I got to see it again for the first time
through his young eyes.  In all of the thousands of movies to which I
have gone, STAR WARS is the only one where I was so pumped up when I
saw it originally in 1977 that I told my wife we had to see it again
immediately.  I got her to move up with me to the fifth row at our then
local (Paramus, New Jersey) monster screen house so that I could be
right there in the thick of the action with the rebel warriors.
     Since I originally saw it before I became I movie critic, I have
never written a review of it.  I will correct that omission now, but I
will stick more to commentary and just highlight some of my favorite
scenes.  To be fair to both of the people on earth who do not know the
story, let me sketch it out for them first.
     The rebel alliance is fighting an evil Empire.  The Empire is
building a Death Star so powerful that it can blow up an entire planet.
They must get the Empire's plans for the Death Star before it becomes
fully operational.  The rebels hope to analyze the plans and find a
weakness that will allow them to destroy the Death Star before it
destroys the rebel's home planets and bases.  Lord Darth Vader (David
Prowse acting with voice by James Earl Jones) and Grand Moff Tarkin
(Peter Cushing) are on the side of the Empire whereas Luke Skywalker
(Mark Hamill), Han Solo (Harrison Ford), Princess Leia Organa (Carrie
Fisher), Ben "Obi-Wan" Kenobi (Alec Guinness), Chewbacca (Peter
Mayhew), C3PO (Anthony Daniels), and R2D2 (Kenny Baker) end up fighting
for the rebels.
     Who would have guessed that young Harrison Ford would become the
only big box office star out of the lot other than Alec Guinness who
already was one?  I incorrectly expected Mark Hamill to cash in on his
fame, but other than the sequels, he basically vanished.  Who were your
favorite characters?
     I was and still am fascinated by the hinted at but never fully
developed chemistry between Luke and Princess Leia.  I was impressed by
the way Fisher played the princess as so tough and yet so regal a
figure.  She is also beautiful and very sexy.  Jeffrey commented out of
the blue on how pretty she is.  Ford is hilarious, and it is still the
funniest part he has ever done.
     Guinness approached his role as if it had religious significance,
and the monks robes he wore added to that dimension.  Certainly the
directing by George Lucas turned a band of mainly neophyte actors into
an ensemble cast much as a new football coach might take a bunch of
rookies and convince them that they were destined to win the
championship their first season.
     For evil, James Earl Jones's voice and the eerie sound effects of
the pumping oxygen made for a forceful villain in Darth Vader.  Most
movies lose it in inappropriate villains, but George Lucas's script
crafts just the right contrast and blend of good and evil.  Moreover,
the script, as I will demonstrate shortly, is funny and downright
brilliant.  The two best parts of the show were the special effects and
the script.  The effects are no longer quite so impressive, but the
script is as strong today as it was then.
     Let me now answer my original question.  The best characters in
the show are C3PO and R2D2.  If you don't fall instantly in love with
both of them, check yourself into the Ebenezer Scrooge Clinic to have
your heart checked out.
     The sets are so imaginative (John Barry, Leslie Dilley, and Norman
Reynolds).  From small details like the shiny black metal of the Death
Star to the larger ones like the design of all of the weapons which are
a mixture of the mechanical, the electrical, the old, and the new.  Han
Solo's ship the Millennium Falcon, for example, has weapons that have
more in common with a B52 than what you will probably find in a future
spaceship.
     The best and funniest scene of the show has to be the bar scene.
I could not imagine more effective designs than the costumes (John
Mollo) and make-up (Stuart Freeborn) in that scene.  I still laugh when
I think about it.
     Now back to the most important part, the script.  Let me show some
of what made this a seminal film in cinematic history while at the same
time absolutely delighting its audiences.  The mysterious force that
pervades the universe is claimed to have ultimate power.  As Darth
Vader puts it, "The ability to destroy a planet is nothing next to the
power of The Force."
     When Luke first lays eyes on this expense spaceship they have
rented, he explodes to Han Solo with, "What a piece of junk!"  Han
confidently defends her with, "She'll make .5 past light speed.  She
may not look like much, but she's got it where it counts."  When Luke
begins to panic later, Han puts him down with, "Traveling through
hyperspace it not like dusting crops, boy."  Han is not impressed by
this Force rubbish saying, "Hokey religions and ancient weapons aren't
as good as a blaster at your side."  Even Princess Leia gets some funny
material.  Getting angry at the Abominable Snowman sized Chewbacca, she
tells the others, "Will somebody get this big walking carpet out of my
way?"
     The quasi-religious figure of Obi-Wan has sayings with biblical
rings to them.  He advises Luke when they are in a seemingly hopeless
situation that, "You can't win, but there are alternatives to
fighting."  When Han tries to put Obi-Wan down, Obi-Wan says, "Who is
more foolish?  The fool or the fool who follows the fool?"
     The music by John Williams is incredible.  It has your adrenaline
pumping in almost every scene.  Most musical scores are lucky if they
have a single decent number.  Williams's score is a cornucopia of
musical wonder.  I hope they will release STAR WARS again to the
theaters soon.  It seemed almost a sacrilege to watch it on merely a
large TV screen with speakers not powerful enough to raise the dead.
     STAR WARS runs 1:57 with perfect editing by Richard Chew, Paul
Hirsch, and Marcia Lucas.  It is correctly rated PG.  There is no sex
or nudity, and since this was before even PG movies felt obliged to
include some bad words, there are none.  There is cowboy level violence
where people are shot with laser weapons called blasters and die
bloodlessly and immediately.  There are a couple of mildly scary
scenes.  One is of a brief shot of a severed and bloody arm and another
is a shot from a distance of the charred remains of Luke's relatives.
I think only kids under 5 will be scared by the show.  Certainly
Jeffrey (age 7) was not frightened, and he adored STAR WARS.  I give it
my top recommendation and rating of ****.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
David Wilcock
A sci-fi/adventure starring Mark Hamill, Carrie Fisher, Peter
Cushing,Harrison Ford and Alec Guiness
Well, what can I say about this film? It's, Star Wars, isn't it? And
everyone knows that Star Wars. But, in this speacil edition, the sound
has been beefed up (the ships really do swoop around you, and the
atmosphere in the Death Star is now much better) Also, there has been
added extra footage, including a conversation between Han Solo (Ford)
and Jabba the Hut (which looks really good)
Everyone knows the plot by now. Hamill, Guiness, Fisher and Ford (plus
his wookie friend Chewbacca, and the droids C3PO and R2D2) all help the
rebels the destroy the empires (led by Cushing, and Darth Vadar who is
voiced by James Earl Jones and David Prowse) evil plan, which is
blowing the rebels up with the Death Star. This has to be one of the
simplest plots ever, and thats what makes the film fun, the fact that
you don't think about whats going on, you just enjoy yourself.
Basically, this has to be one of the best space adventures out there.
The bad guys are really bad, the good guys do really good guy things
(all stick for each other, etc) and C3PO and R2D2 have to be one of the
greatest comedy pairings ever. And with the new THX and digital sound,
and the added footage, it is even better.
So, overall then, I would recommended this film to anyone over the age of 3.
See it!

Author
Jerry Saravia
George Lucas' "Star Wars" is one of the great outer space fantasy movies of all
time - it was, and still is, a gleefully exciting popcorn movie full of
special-effects galore and chivalrous heroes, stubborn princesses, evil dark
empires, and two cute robots. The characters were Luke Skywalker, Han Solo,
Princess Leia, Obi-Wan Kenobi, Yoda and Darth Vader, to name a few. Now comes
the special edition of this special trilogy of movies and, despite some flaws
with the post-tinkering, they are a fond reminder of how groundbreaking these
movies were and how they changed Hollywood forever. They initiated the term:
blockbuster.
The original "Star Wars" was a major box-office success signaling the rise of
merchandising and the wave of Hollywood blockbusters to come. The main
difference between "Star Wars" and the so-called action entertainment of today
is that "Star Wars" had wit, style and imagination to spare, not gratuitous
action scenes and bloody violence at the expense of a story or characters worth
caring about (See "The Lost World" for proof). 
It is a sheer joy to watch this film restored to its original glory with its
blazing colors, beautiful cinematography and the uplifting Dolby Digital
musical score by John Williams. The special-effects are as awesome as they ever
were, including the classic battle on the Death Star, the plentiful laser gun
fights, and the lightsaber duel between Vader and Kenobi. 
The actors are also rather pleasing to watch after all these years. Harrison
Ford has as much fun here as when he played Indiana Jones and his constant
snickering and witty asides are as marvelous as ever. Ditto the youthful Carrie
Fisher as Princess Leia; James Earl Jones' eerie voice for the mysterious Darth
Vader; the comic biplay between the lovable robots C3PO and R2D2; Mark Hamill's
naive farm boy Luke Skywalker who eventually becomes a fighter pilot for the
Rebellion (Hamill's career never took off the way his co-stars did); the
masterful restraint of Sir Alec Guinness as the sage Obi-Wan; Peter Mayhew as
the hairy seven-foot growling Chewbacca; and notably Peter Cushing as the
commander of the Death Star station - he's almost as scary as Vader when he
blows up Leia's home planet Alderaan!
The additions to "Star Wars" are not as invigorating as one would hope yet some
of them are essential. The addition of a younger, less slimier Jabba the Hutt
who confronts Han Solo after Solo killed one of his henchmen, Greedo, is fun to
watch but nonessential. Firstly, Jabba seems friendly and warm when compared to
the evil, corrupt reptilian seen in Return of the Jedi. Secondly, Jabba
reiterates everything that Greedo says to Solo in the previous scene. Referring
back to the Greedo confrontation, moralist George Lucas decides to have Han
Solo defend himself by showing Greedo shooting Han, and missing (!), and then
Han kills Greedo. Originally, Han was to have shot Greedo in cold-blood - that
was the point because he was a daredevil pilot who would shoot at anything. But
by reversing and changing the scene, Lucas makes a different point all together
which is that some films are better left in their original format. 
Other additions actually work quite well. The introduction of the spaceport Mos
Eisley, where Luke and Kenobi find Han, is filled with more neat outside shots
of the city. There's also a terrific scene where Luke talks to Briggs, his
fellow pilot, before they take off for attack. The sequence where Luke and Leia
are shooting stormtroopers over an abyss is enhanced aurally with echoes and is
more magnificent than ever.
"Star Wars" is not the only one with a makeover - "The Empire Strikes Back" has
some finishing touches but most of it has been left intact. This is the best of
the trilogy and it also has more depth, humor and character development than
either one. Han Solo is more reckless and suffers a horrible fate; Luke
Skywalker learns the way of the Jedi from a nine-hundred year old wizened
creature called Yoda, and faces Vader; Leia falls in love with Han; there are
more special effects including a superb asteroid battle; a startling revelation
about Darth Vader, and a dark ending where neither the Rebellion nor the Empire
wins. It's a grand space opera with imagination and great storytelling to
spare. 
"Return of the Jedi" suffers the most from the changes, and it is also the
weakest of the three. Firstly, there's an embarrassing sequence redone with CGI
effects (and a new song!) in Jabba the Hutt's palace, which looks more like an
outtake from a Disney musical. Secondly, I noticed a bizarre trimming of the
Ewok celebration at the end - Luke's close-ups in recognition of the spirits of
Vader, Kenobi and Yoda seemed to have been cut, and the new Ewok song is less
joyful and more of a distraction than anything else. 
Needless to say, the effects in "Jedi" are the best of the three, including the
battle on the barge in Tattoine, and the battle on Endor with the flying bikes.
Harrison Ford seems stoned out of his mind and less heroic than usual.
Ironically, it is Mark Hamill and Carrie Fisher who give the better
performances. Luke is more mature and has progressed into a full-fledged Jedi;
Leia seems to finally know how to shoot lasers and has one tender scene with
Luke; and Chewbacca, C3PO and R2D2 are more annoying than ever. Revelations are
aplenty and we finally get to see what Darth Vader really looks like under that
mask. "Jedi" is not a great film but it is a worthy successor that could have
shimmered with improvements in the script department (And get rid of those
characterless Ewoks who resemble nothing more than teddy bears!).
The special edition of the "Star Wars" trilogy is not as great as it should
have been nor does it surpass the original versions. Still, nobody should pass
up the grand opportunity of seeing this fantastic space odyssey on the silver
screen. George Lucas should be proud of renewing interest in these
science-fiction classics for a whole new generation. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general comments at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Phil Curtolo
In May of 1977, just 2 years after Steven Spielberg's success with Jaws
and 3 years after Francis Coppolas' The Godfather, a risky, ambitious
young director named George Lucas went for the same unpredictable box
office success. Little did he know that Star Wars would become the
greatest science fiction epic in the history of film.
In January of this year, Lucas re-released Star Wars on its 20th
anniversary. In this new, remastered version, the added effects, which
range from leathery desert beasts inserted into already existing shots
to an awkward new scene in which Hans Solo bargains his way out of a jam
with a computer-generated Jabba the Hutt, don't do much but call
attention to themselves. Other than these, the film is exactly the same.
Why pay to see it in the theaters, you might ask? Simply because when
this movie was released, most of us were a few years short of being
born. We should all get up and go to the movies for the experience,
especially if you haven't seen it.
The plot is basic but in the same way, complex. It has many themes, but
the one rotates around Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) and his quest to
become a Jedi Knight. His mission begins when a droid named R2-D2 plays
back a secret message recorded by the beautiful Princess Leia (Carrie
Fisher), which tells him to contact the mysterious Obi-Wan Kanoby (Alec
Guiness). 
He and Kanoby then, joined by two inter-galactic renegades, Hans Solo
(Harrison Ford) and Chewbacca, and Skywalker's two droids D2 and C3PO
(the voice of Anthony Edwards), wage war upon the corrupt Empire,
commanded by an evil general (Peter Cushing) and the traitorous Darth
Vader (the voice of James Earl Jones). Skywalker defeats the evil Empire
by rising out of himself to embrace something larger: the force. 
The film is obviously quite star-studded. But how was Lucas to know that
Ford would become one of the most sought after men in Hollywood and
Jones' voice would appear so many more times in the future? It just
happened to work out for him.
The magic of Star Wars lies in the way that Skywalker's triumph is
symbolized by the audience's sense of becoming something larger than
life itself-a universe of fans, young and old, recreating a movie
atmosphere that will impress generations forever.
Grade: A+, ***** out of *****

Author
Christopher E. Meadows
Books could be, and indeed have been written about the Star Wars
trilogy, and rightfully so.  This is a set of movies that shattered all
expectations of what science fiction could be in the late 70s/early 80s,
inspiring literally dozens of clones, from Battlestar Galactica all the
way up to Stargate and Independance Day, and one could argue
revitalizing the whole science fiction genre.  The special effects were
groundbreaking, revolutionary for their day and still eminently
watchable well into twenty years later.  Literally millions of people
have seen the Star Wars trilogy and been touched by it.  And now, George
Lucas brings it back for a new audience to enjoy. 
Much has been and is still being made of the fact that Mr. Lucas has
gone back and revised his trilogy for rerelease now.  Some fans are
angry that he has dared to meddle with what they consider perfection,
while others are thrilled by the idea of seeing yesterday's Star Wars
updated with today's special effects wizardry.  Either way, the Special
Edition release means that Star Wars is back on the big screen, where
it rightfully deserves to be seen.
Can there be anyone in the world who doesn't know what Star Wars is
about?  In a way, Star Wars is so much a part of our cultural heritage
that it feels silly and almost artificial to try to summarize it.  It's
a story about a young man's coming of age, a fight for freedom against
an oppressive empire, a tale of swashbuckling and derring-do the likes
of which haven't been seen on the silver screen in decades, strange new
worlds with strange alien creatures and weird surprises around every
turn, and the yearning within each of us to realize our dreams and make
a difference in the world.  It's high adventure, incredible special
effects, and...well, it's just an _experience_.  Something about this
movie sparked the imagination of a generation...and it's about to do so
again. 
This new release of Star Wars comes as no surprise to many of the film's
devoted fans, who have been trading rumors and bits of information about
it for quite some time now.  Interviews, trailers, leaks from within
Lucasfilm...all of these have been collected, collated, and placed on
webpages for people to see (pages such as
http://www.islandnet.com/~corona/films/details/sw4.html or, my personal
favorite, http://leopard.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~koukoula/).  Pictures of
before and after have been placed side by side...even months before the
movies were released, fans were making comparisons. 
In some cases, the changes were nothing less than phenomenal, and this
can be seen from the comparison shots even before you go into the movie
theater.  The digital matte effects that were little more than a toy in
Forrest Gump are put to excellent use here, unnoticeably sprucing up
scenes that that George Lucas was unsatisfied with in the original.  For
instance, in my personal favorite example, the ancient temple on Yavin
that was formerly a flat stone edifice now has deep, moss-covered
carvings and etchings.  And Mos Eisley Spaceport is now a bustling,
booming city, with more surprises and things going on in the background
than you can notice on the first viewing.  
All the starships and fighters are now computer-animated, getting rid of
glitches and artifacts of the special effects processes used when the
film was originally made--and they look _fantastic_.  Four and a half
minutes of new or missing footage have been added, including a scene
with Jabba the Hutt that had originally been shelved because the state
of special effects in 1977 simply couldn't do it justice. 
However, much of the ten million dollars that was spent on the Star Wars
Special Edition restoration went into restoring the quality of the film
itself.  The negatives, badly damaged by the ravages of time, were
brightened and returned to their original splendor.  The audio tracks
were remixed and reprocessed, with reworked sound effects by effects
maven Ben Burtt, into glorious, booming, theater-shaking full-THX Dolby
digital stereo.  And _that_, more than the added scenes or new special
effects, is where the real value of this new version lies.  It's really
true what they say in the commercials: Star Wars loses _so much_ on the
small screen.  Even letterboxing doesn't make up for the decrease in
size and definition. 
In regard to the Star Wars Special Edition, and to the other two films
of the trilogy which have yet to be released, I'll make this final
recommendation: Go and see it.  Go and see it more than once...it may be
another twenty years before it comes back to the big screen after it's
gone this time.  Take along the youngsters who've never had the
big-screen Star Wars experience--you'll enjoy seeing it through their
eyes as much as they will enjoy it for the first time.  There's magic in
this movie--Special Edition or no, there can be no denying that it's
still Star Wars, and still has the power to thrill and enthrall children
of all ages, from four to four hundred.  Let's all return to that time
long ago, and that galaxy far, far away... 
This review is copyright 1997 by Christopher E. Meadows.  Permission
granted for not-for-profit Usenet distribution via rec.arts.movies
reviews and associated archival; permission granted for inclusion in
Internet Movie Database and associated archival.  All other
distribution, including CD-ROM, requires permission from the author. 
-- 
Chris Meadows aka  | Author, Team M.E.C.H.A., Crapshoot & Co.
Robotech_Master    | on the Superguy Listserv (bit.listserv.superguy)
robotech@jurai.net | With a World Wide Web homepage located at
robotech@eyrie.org | http://www.jurai.net/~robotech/index.html

Author
Max Scheinin
I imagine that upon the initial release of George Lucas's Star-Wars there
was much excitement; too this day SW is the greatest adventure film of all
time.Imagine what it would be like to enter the theatre with no
expectations and to exit having seen a revalation in the entire history of
cinema. I can't remember the first time I saw the film but it must have
been early in my life. Like 'Singin' In The Rain','The Wizard Of Oz', and
Disney's 'Dumbo'  ( all of which I saw on video ) it made an impression on
my imagination and my life. The excitement never let up. The story was
beautifully simple, the characterizations a  total delight. So when I heard
it was to be re-released in theaters I was wonderfully excited. I was
convinced it would be a life changing experience, something         I would never
under any circumstances forget. The movie was not a dissapointment; I saw
it at an advance screening for the press and it was a truly moving
experience. 
I have seen SW so many times that I know the dialogue by heart. The very
sight of C3PO scolding R2D2  before entering the pod relluctantly brings a
goofy grin to my face. When they arive on Tatooine I feel beautifuly
nolstalgic. I love to think to myself that this galaxy does exist. It all
works for me and  everytime I see the film I am completely engrossed from
start to finish (  I have the same reaction to The Godfather, Casablanca
and Singin' In The Rain ). Yet seeing it on a big screen was completely
different. I first saw it at the afore mentioned critic's showing. Then I
saw it on the third day of it's re-release with a friend. It was truly a
communal experience, the most exilarating experience I have ever had
staring at shimmering images on an other-wise blank screen
I knew that it would be wonderful as soon as I saw the trailer for Volcano;
halfway through the preview someone yelled "booor-rrrrrring", and there was
cheering. That's the kind of experience that money can't buy. Why is the
movie so wonderful? It takes a little adventure and stirs it around with
some wonderful special-effects and charming performances. But what really
makes the film special is it's sense of wonder and innocence. I think it's
fair to say that we would'n't have seen Independence Day if it hadn't been
preceded by Star Wars
and I think Independence Day's makers have seen Star Wars ( did anybody
else notice the tribute to Empire Strikes Back when Goldblum and Smith are
escaping from the mother ship? ).  I think that ID4 wants to be like Star
Wars - a film that will always be remebered. Yet it won't, and I'll say
why. Star Wars believed that there was something wonderful waiting to be
discovered. It believed that if it WAS discovered ( and it probably never
will ) there would be a sense of wonder to it all. And that is what ID4 (
and Twister, Waterworld, Jurassic Park and it's sequel ) are all missing;
that wonderful mysterious sense of awe. That is why Star Wars will always
be remembered.

Author
Jonathan Capps
I don't think many people realize this, but the Star Wars Trilogy was
all one script.  They were all written way before the trilogy.  They
were one script, but when George Lucas made the first movie, he
realized the script was way too long.  So he took the first 1/3 of the
script, expanded it, and made it into Star Wars: A New Hope.  He took
the next 1/3, expanded it, and made Star Wars: The Empire Strikes Back.
 He took the last 1/3, expanded it and made Star Wars: Return of the
Jedi.  Then the Star Wars Triolgy was complete.
George Lucas was never happy with the first film because he felt it
never had his full creative vision.  When he made the third one, he
realized he needed to put Jabba the Hut back into the original.  Return
of the Jedi is NOT a remake of the A New Hope.  It was all one script
originally.  What is a remake of the first is A New Hope Special
Edition.
A New Hope Special Edition is a great movie.  There's 4 minutes of new
footage and a new THX soundtrack was added.  Empire Strikes Back
Special Edition and Return of the Jedi Special Edition are also great
films.  The new scenes are clever, funny, and innovative.  Especially
on RotJ when they add the celebrations of the empire's defeat on Cloud
City, Mos Eisley, and then the Imperial Capital, Coruscant.  They added
a new Ewok song as well.
I really enjoyed the Special Editions.
I've seen A New Hope twice.
I've seen The Empire Strikes Back three times.
I've seen Return of the Jedi twice.  (I hope to see it once more.)
The Star Wars Trilogy Special Edition is a great 20th anniversery gift.
 If you've only seen them on the little screen, you haven't seen them
at all.  If you havn't gone and seen them on the big screen, I advise
you to go.  Please see them...you'll be glad you did.  I promise!

Author
Stephen Rowley
Star Wars: Special Edition (George Lucas), 1997
Review from Cinephobia
When I first heard that George Lucas wanted to rerelease "Star Wars"
with new special effects, I thought it was a great idea. There are a
lot of dodgy shots in Star Wars: Lucas was working with primitive
technology on a very tight budget. This meant that some effects were
visibly fake (one alien
in the Cantina was obviously just a guy in a werewolf mask) or
disappointingly staged (such as the static, uninteresting movement of
the fighters in the final battle).
The changes made in the final battle scene for the "Special Edition"
are along the line I hoped Lucas would take. He has resisted the urge
to mount a major overhaul, and some of the new material is great:
there is a fantastic new shot of the Rebel squadron flying towards the
Death Star. At the same time, the better shots from the original film
have been left unchanged. The wonderful shot of the Millennium Falcon
emerging from the sun is an example of this. There are also some new
effects elsewhere in the film that are excellent, such as the very
dramatic new shot of the Jawa's sandcrawler.
Many of the other changes, however, are seriously misguided. The first
really bad sequence is a brief one: several stormtroopers search the
desert for R2-D2 and C-3PO riding large creatures (apparently known as
"Dewbacks"). This sequence was present in the original, but in shorter
form, with stuffed, immobile versions of the Dewbacks visible in the
distance. Lucas obviously felt the advances in computer graphics made
on Jurassic Park provided a perfect opportunity to bring these
creatures to the fore, making "Star Wars" just that extra bit more
exotic. The problem is, the creatures look terrible. Like some of the
creatures in "Jurassic Park," the skin looks slightly wrong.
More seriously, however, they are terribly animated. On "Jurassic"
Spielberg had a team of experienced animators manipulating the
dinosaurs (led by Phil Tippet, who ironically did some brief
stop-motion work for the original "Star Wars"). Here, though, the
creatures' over-exaggerated movements make it look suspiciously like
Lucas let the computer boffins animate them themselves.
This annoyed me. Yet in itself it does not really count as artistic
vandalism. What does, however, is the awful scene in which Jabba the
Hutt appears. This has been made possible by the existence of footage
of Han Solo meeting Jabba the Hutt that was cut from the original.
Lucas claims that the scene was cut because he ran out of money to
complete a special effects Jabba. He says the swarthy actor in the
original scene was present merely to give Harrison Ford somebody to
play against, and that Jabba would have been a stop-motion creature
inserted in post-production.
I find this extremely hard to believe. The scene is simply not filmed
in a way that would have made this feasible given Lucas' tight budget
and the limitations of 1977 technology. If he had been adding a
creature, wouldn't he have prevented Ford from walking both in front
of and behind the actor? Wouldn't he have had them standing still?
Wouldn't he have chosen a thinner actor who could be more easily
hidden "underneath" the animated Jabba? All these factors combine to
suggest that the shot Lucas claims he intended was virtually
impossible. Jabba would have been a more ambitious special effect than
anything achieved in the two (much higher budgeted) sequels. (A check
of Alan Dean Foster's ghostwritten novelisation, which included the
Jabba scene, seems to bear this out: Foster's description of Jabba is
vague, but to me reads as a human).
If this is true, then Lucas cut the scene not because he couldn't
achieve it, but simply because it didn't work. The evidence bears this
out: the scene is terrible. For some reason, the dialogue repeats much
of what Han had said to Greedo word for word. Jabba is far too
friendly to Han, giving him an extended time period to pay his debt
with almost no argument. Not only does this clash with the tough Jabba
we would see later in "Return of the Jedi," but it also undermines
Solo's motivation for taking Luke and Obi-Wan. Perhaps oddest of all
is that the scene ruins the moment in which we first see the
Millennium Falcon: a little later Luke, Obi-Wan, and the droids are
led into
the loading bay, and we get a chord of music for our first look at the
ship. Yet with the Jabba scene included, we've actually already seen
it. And this is before I even mention the poor effects work. Jabba is
better animated than the dewbacks, but he still looks like an effect
(give me a rubber puppet any day). And because of the twin
difficulties of plausibly moving Jabba and fitting him into the frame,
he's been made smaller, so that he looks nothing like the "Jedi"
Jabba. This rather defeats the purpose of reinserting the scene.
Given all these problems, why did Lucas put it in at all? The answer
is surely that he felt he needed more than a simple spit-and-polish of
his old film to maximise the hype. After all, this is much more than a
simple re-release. Lucas is in pre-production on Episodes I to III of
the Star Wars saga, to be released starting in 1999. A three film
commitment is not to be sneezed at, so the re-release of the old films
is a perfect way of testing the waters while stoking the fires (if I
may mix a metaphor or two). Not to mention the fact that through his
control of all Star Wars merchandise (toys, computer games, books,
lunchboxes... you name it) Lucas stands to make zillions if the
re-release takes off. Thus he needs to make the re-release huge, and
the best way to do that is to offer the fans "a few new surprises."
Extra footage is the perfect hook - even if it comes from the cutting
room floor.
This is change for the sake of change, and it harms the film. It's not
unlike the colorisation of black and white movies: to me the fact that
Lucas is doing it to his own films makes no difference.
___________________________
Review (C) 1998 by Stephen Rowley. All rights reserved.
Please do not reproduce in whole or in part without my permission.
I can be contacted at cinephobia@Not!yahoo.com
(Remove the Not! for the correct address).
For a slightly different version of these ideas (focussing slightly
less specifically on Star Wars), go to:
http://www.werple.net.au/~lerowley/specedit.htm
For more reviews and essays, check out Cinephobia:
http://www.werple.net.au/~lerowley/cinephob.htm

Author
Chad Polenz
Star Wars
Chad'z rating: **** (out of 4 = excellent)
1977, PG, 121 minutes [2 hours, 1 minute]
[fantasy]
starring: Mark Hamill (Luke Skywalker), Harrison Ford (Han Solo), Carrie
Fisher (Princess Leia), Alec Guinness (Obi-Wan "Ben" Kenobi), James Earl
Jones (voice of Darth Vader), produced by Gary Kurtz, written and directed by
George Lucas.
        The basic purpose of all forms of entertainment, especially fiction, is
escapism. If ever there was a film that fulfilled that need for escapism,
"Star Wars" is it. All stories must establish and make real the atmosphere in
which they take place, but this movie doesn't just establish an overall
setting, it creates an entire universe! The battle between good and evil is
the basic premise, but because it takes place in an completely different
reality, it is unlike any story ever told before.
        As the story opens, we watch a small spaceship be taken over by a much
larger one. We learn this small ship is part of a rebellion against an evil,
oppressive government. When the evil leader Darth Vader (voiced by Jones)
appears, we learn something about secret plans a cute princess named Leia
(Fisher) has stolen. The mood is then set and you can tell a grand adventure
is going to take place. 
        Just before her ship was captured, Leia hid the plans in the memory banks of
R2-D2 (Kenny Baker) and C3-PO (Anthony Daniels), two "droids" (robots) who
escape the rebel ship and crash-land on a desert planet. They are later
captured and sold to a farmer and his nephew Luke (Hamill).
        Luke Skywalker is a young man who, from his presence alone, represents some
kind of salvation or freedom. This is proved true during an encounter Luke
has with an old man named Obi-Wan "Ben" Kenobi (Guinness). We learn more
about his father - he was an important person in the rebellion, and he, like
Ben, were mystical masters of "The Force." The Force is an invisible energy
field that binds the universe and those that can expand their mind and can
use it to become powerful Jedi Knights. This element is probably the most
significant and original aspect to the film, as it resembles Zen philosophy
but takes it one step further and adds a supernatural power to it. This makes
the film even more interesting because it seems somewhat secretive. Ben
encourages Luke to learn the ways of The Force as he could be (and will be) a
powerful warrior against Vader's tyranny.
        The first half moves slowly as it takes the time to establish and define
many details. We witness the power of the Galactic Empire when its primary
space station, the Death Star, destroys a planet. Meanwhile, Luke and Ben,
along with their escorts and new friends Han Solo (Ford) and Chewbacca (Peter
Mayhew), find themselves in a real jam. En route to return the droids to the
rebels, they are captured by the Death Star's tractor beam. Harrison Ford
steals the show as the cocky space smuggler Solo, and we also get great
camaraderie between him and Luke.
        As if the grand adventure had not been potent and fluid enough, it becomes
the definition of excitement when Luke, Han, and Chewie attempt to rescue the
princess. Much action ensues as the heroes attempt to escape and save the
princess, but it doesn't always seem as if they're going to succeed - now
that's what makes for good suspense.
        Perhaps one of the greatest moments in movie history is the entire third act
of the film. When the rebels prepare to attack the Death Star it is not just
an adventurous battle, but a symbol of the powers of good versus evil.
Lucas's script builds the tension dramatically, his direction, along with the
outstanding special effects, work together so perfectly it doesn't seem like
a movie but a journey to a place where the events are actually happening. 
        In retrospect, "Star Wars" is a pretty simple story of adventure, but it
never presents itself in such a manner. Everything about this movie is
perfect: the story is detailed but not confusing; the characters are well
defined; the actors all deliver outstanding performances; and the final
payoff gives one a sensation that is almost undescribable. 
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     This year marks the tenth anniversary of George Lucas's STAR WARS.  I
think it is fairly safe to say that for the fantasy film genre and for the
film industry as a whole, the decade has been very different than might have
been expected when Fox was telling theaters that if they wanted to show THE
OTHER SIDE OF MIDNIGHT they would also have to book this science fiction
film, STAR WARS.  There is little doubt--at least to my mind--that STAR WARS
is one of the three most influential films ever made.  In fact, the only
film that obviously was more influential was Edward Muybridge's sequence of
snapshots of a running racehorse that was, in essence, the first motion
picture.
     But "influential" and "good" are two different things.  Recently, when
I listed films that I gave my highest rating to, I included STAR WARS.  One
comment I got from a reader was that it was a good list but should not
include STAR WARS.  The belief that STAR WARS is actually good as a film is
actually not very common.  I have heard it claimed that it is the weakest of
the three currently released "Star Wars" films or that the whole series is a
piece of fluff without much cinematic merit.  It is my contention that the
original STAR WARS is, on its own, a good film and the best of its series.
Though it is not in the scope of this short article to examine an entire
decade of fantasy films.  I would contend that no better science fiction,
horror, or fantasy film has been made in the interim.
     Before we can determine if STAR WARS really is a great film, in the
sense that CITIZEN KANE is a great film, we have to determine some
characteristics of film greatness.  What is it that makes a film great?  One
characteristic would be originality.  A film should be experimental and
should break new ground.  But many film experiments fail and leave audiences
confused.  The new ground that a film breaks must be accepted by audiences
so that a film leaves its mark.  To this extent, being good is connected
with being influential.  Still, it is clear that an exploitation film may be
the first of its kind and have imitators without being very good.  The
ground that a film breaks must be valuable.  It should advance the art of
filmmaking.  If a film does what it does well, breaks new ground in the art
of filmmaking making valuable contributions, and those contributions are
accepted by audiences and become part of the palette for future filmmakers,
no more is required for a film to achieve greatness.  If you come down to
it, that is really what makes CITIZEN KANE a great film.  But is STAR WARS
great in the same sense?  I think that while CITIZEN KANE undeniably has
some virtues that STAR WARS lacks (and vice versa), STAR WARS is great in
the same sense.
     STAR WARS WAS A GROUND-BREAKING FILM.  It was the first marrying of
cinema and the new video and computer technologies for creating images on
film.  The effects people had to invent much of the technology as they went
along.  The last jump in visual technology of the same magnitude had been
with Willis O'Brien's stop-motion effects for KING KONG.  As late as the
'60s the most visually imaginative films--films like JASON AND THE
ARGONAUTS--still relied most heavily on variations on, and enhancements of,
O'Brien's techniques.  Between JASON AND THE ARGONAUTS and STAR WARS there
were some impressive pieces of visual fantasy, notably 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY
and LOGAN'S RUN, but they relied mostly on just extensive use of model work
and other long-existing technologies.  For STAR WARS a battery of new
technologies was employed and for the first time since KING KONG special
effects made a real quantum leap toward the goal of being able to create on
the screen any scene that the mind's eye can create.
     STAR WARS was obviously a ground-breaking film from the first moments
of the film.  Just showing a field of stars, STAR WARS did something that no
other film had ever done.  It panned the camera upward.  That does not sound
like much, but consider that not even 2001 had ever done it before.  Space
scenes had always been done with a fixed camera, and for a very good reason.
It was more economical not to create a background of stars large enough to
pan through.  So scenes in space had always been done with a static camera,
just like all scenes were done in the early days of film.  I had never even
realized that in all science fiction films I had seen, the space shots were
done with a static camera until the instant I saw Lucas's 90-degree pan.
Not a single model had shown on the screen and certainly not a single set or
character and already the film was a one-of-a-kind!
     When we do finally meet characters the first two we meet are robots
with personalities that are a cliche now, but the closest I remember seeing
before was the robot in LOST IN SPACE, who occasionally would lose his cool
and yell, "Warning! Warning!  Danger!  Danger!" while gesticulating wildly.
We have seen characters for all of two seconds on the screen before we again
see that STAR WARS was unprecedented.
     And the impact of STAR WARS continues right through the film.  Scene
after scene is done with an originality and sense of wonder totally
unprecedented in the science fiction film.  The audience reaction was
nothing short of astounding.  In Detroit, where the film played there was a
difficult left turn to get to the theater parking lot.  VARIETY reported
that making that left turn had become the new summer sport in Detroit.  The
lines that queued up to see the film were legendary because in so many
different ways the film delivered more than it had to.  There was more bang
per dollar of admission then perhaps any other film made to that point.
     One thing the film delivered was a sparkling score by John Williams.
Williams used a leit-motif approach, but composed many themes, each of which
was attractive and which blended together into a very fine score that was
reproduced--for the first time--with the process of Dolby sound.  It gave a
live-orchestral clarity to the score as well as allowing far more use of
subliminal sound effects surrounding the audience.  Many were barely
perceptible to the ear but certainly helped to make the experience seem more
believable.
     This reality was further enhanced by the detail Lucas embued the film
with.  Small details--throwaways--that few filmmakers bother with were
painstakingly added.  In one scene after the visit to the cantina, we are
watching the main characters in the background and the silhouettes of two
spindly legs walk by in the foreground.  Because that is not where the
viewer's attention is at the time, many in the audience never even noticed
the legs.  To throw in unnecessary details and then purposely call the
viewer's attention away so the details may well go unnoticed is a mark of a
good craftsman.
     A little more noticeable, though again unnecessary to the plot, is the
skeleton shown in the background in a desert scene.  Nobody in the script
mentions the skeleton of some gargantuan desert creature, as if it is a
perfectly normal sight.  Similarly the speeder, which could have been easily
made a wheeled vehicle, instead floats.  No mention is made of the floating
vehicle; again, the matter of fact acceptance of this wonder is what helps
to make the film work.
     More noticeable but equally unrequired to the plot are some
breathtaking planetscapes, again of a scale that never had been used in
science fiction films to that point.  Films like THIS ISLAND EARTH or FIRST
SPACESHIP ON VENUS had shown planetary landscapes but they used unconvincing
models or matte paintings.  ILM has since become known for very impressive
backgrounds and spacescapes.  STAR WARS was their debut.
     A few more touches, perhaps not as original, but which were unexpected,
should be mentioned.  One is the use of two distinguished actors in major
roles.  Getting Sir Alec Guinness to appear in any science fiction film is
something of a wonder.  His first response on seeing the script was
reportedly, "Oh crumbs, this isn't for me." He enjoyed the script
sufficiently, however, that he changed his mind.  More so than even actors
like Olivier or Gielgud, Guinness has been selective of his parts and his
presence in this film puts STAR WARS in fine company.  Peter Cushing was
then, as he is now, perhaps the most accomplished and beloved of actors
specializing in fantasy roles.
     Another unusual touch is the pacing.  The audience comes in with the
story already in progress.  The viewer has to catch up by reading the screen
explanation rolling by, then is immediately tossed into the action.  This
requires more from the audience, but that is far better than boring the
audience with slow introductions.  This style, borrowed from internal
chapters of serials, might not work well outside of the fantasy genre, but
captures audiences very effectively here.
     It seems then that STAR WARS was an innovative film, every bit as much
as was CITIZEN KANE.  Had this much innovation been lavished on a mainstream
film it would be considered an artistic triumph.  As it was, it was a box-
office champion, an accolade that perhaps meant even more, at least to its
backers.
     I would like to conclude this discussion with a comparison of the "Star
Wars" films which purport to be a continuation of the same story but which I
consider to be stylistically inferior to the first film.  I will continue to
call it STAR WARS, incidentally, in spite of the retitling to STAR WARS: A
NEW HOPE.
     When George Lucas made STAR WARS he had little expectation that it
would become one of the most popular films ever made.  In some ways that
contributed to the artistic achievement.  In the later films he knew what
had worked well in the first film and could consciously repeat and
effectively milk it.  In the first film the line "I've got a bad feeling
about this" was used and got a positive audience reaction.  It even appeared
on humorous buttons people wore at science fiction conventions.  It was a
good line, but its popularity prompted it to be used twice in THE EMPIRE
STRIKES BACK.
     Each of the STAR WARS treats aliens in a different manner, but the
first film is by far the most satisfying treatment.  In that film robots,
intelligent non-humans (INH), and humans all interact in roughly the way
people of different origins interact in New York City.  STAR WARS takes
place in a sort of melting-pot universe.  We are introduced to many species
of INH in STAR WARS.  The only new one to be added in THE EMPIRE STRIKES
BACK was Yoda.  For that matter, Chewbacca is the only other INH in THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK.  Gone is the melting-pot universe.  It was, however,
back with a vengeance in RETURN OF THE JEDI.
     In a documentary made by Lucasfilm, it was claimed that George Lucas
was never happy with the aliens in STAR WARS and he was finally able to
create the effect he wanted for RETURN OF THE JEDI.  True, there were more
aliens in RETURN OF THE JEDI, but they were stupid ideas for aliens.  While
the aliens in STAR WARS were misshapen creatures designed by Ralph
McQuarrie, Ron Cobb, and Rick Baker, RETURN OF THE JEDI featured aliens like
Sly Snoodles, a singing elephant with lips on the end of her nose.  Also,
there is Salacious Crumb, a rather obvious muppet who looks like he would be
more at home on FRAGGLE ROCK than in a major motion picture.  And who can
forget the dancing fat woman?  Of somewhat higher quality are the pig
guards, but they are reminiscent of Earth creatures and look like something
out of a fairy tale.  Only Jabba the Hut seems sufficiently alien and he
resembles a caterpillar.  The aliens are cute and not crisply done like the
creatures in STAR WARS.
     And speaking of cute, Lucas at one point said the third film would take
place in large part on the Wookie planet.  But Wookies would not have made
very good toys and certainly not new toys, so Lucas reversed the syllables
in Wookie and got Ewok, a lovable, merchandisable teddy bear.  Most fans
over the age of ten get a little sick at the thought of Ewoks.
     There is also a question of realism.  In the first film we see a
guerilla attack on the Death Star; the second has the Empire crushing a
rebel base; the third has the killing of Jabba and his crew and the Empire
fighting the teddy bear Ewoks.  So in which of the three films do we see the
greatest number of allies of the rebellion killed?  By far, the answer is
the first film.  Not even counting Lars and Beru, who were innocent
bystanders, more allies were killed in the attack on the Death Star, which
was done reasonably realistically, than in all the battles in the later
films.  In RETURN OF THE JEDI one Ewok is apparently killed, I think, and
one is knocked out by his own bolo.  Very few "good-guys" are killed in THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK, in spite of the apparent darker tone of the second
film.
     Because of all the points mentioned above and because so much more of
Lucas's creativity went into the first film, for which a universe was
created--the other two films just used, and only in minor ways amplified on,
this universe--I still contend it was the best of the three films and will
remain the "Star Wars" film most people will remember.  In 2077, it will be
the best-remembered "Star Wars" film.
